Illinois, session 104th, SB673.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 5changing Section 1-110 as follows: 6    (40 ILCS 5/1-110)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 1-110)7    Sec. 1-110. Prohibited Transactions. 8    (a) A fiduciary with respect to a retirement system, 9pension fund, or investment board shall not cause the the 10retirement system or pension fund to engage in a transaction 11if he or she knows or should know that such transaction 12constitutes a direct or indirect: 13        (1) Sale or exchange, or leasing of any property from 14    the retirement system or pension fund to a party in 15    interest for less than adequate consideration, or from a 16    party in interest to a retirement system or pension fund 17    for more than adequate consideration. 18        (2) Lending of money or other extension of credit from 19    the retirement system or pension fund to a party in 20    interest without the receipt of adequate security and a 21    reasonable rate of interest, or from a party in interest 22    to a retirement system or pension fund with the provision 23    of excessive security or an unreasonably high rate of   SB0673- 2 -LRB104 06980 RPS 17017 b1    interest. 2        (3) Furnishing of goods, services or facilities from 3    the retirement system or pension fund to a party in 4    interest for less than adequate consideration, or from a 5    party in interest to a retirement system or pension fund 6    for more than adequate consideration. 7        (4) Transfer to, or use by or for the benefit of, a 8    party in interest of any assets of a retirement system or 9    pension fund for less than adequate consideration.10    (b) A fiduciary with respect to a retirement system or 11pension fund established under this Code shall not: 12        (1) Deal with the assets of the retirement system or 13    pension fund in his own interest or for his own account; 14        (2) In his individual or any other capacity act in any 15    transaction involving the retirement system or pension 16    fund on behalf of a party whose interests are adverse to 17    the interests of the retirement system or pension fund or 18    the interests of its participants or beneficiaries; or 19        (3) Receive any consideration for his own personal 20    account from any party dealing with the retirement system 21    or pension fund in connection with a transaction involving 22    the assets of the retirement system or pension fund.23    (c) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to prohibit 24any trustee from: 25        (1) Receiving any benefit to which he may be entitled 26    as a participant or beneficiary in the retirement system   SB0673- 3 -LRB104 06980 RPS 17017 b1    or pension fund. 2        (2) Receiving any reimbursement of expenses properly 3    and actually incurred in the performance of his duties 4    with the retirement system or pension fund. 5        (3) Serving as a trustee in addition to being an 6    officer, employee, agent or other representative of a 7    party in interest.8    (d) A fiduciary of a pension fund established under 9Article 3 or 4 shall not knowingly cause or advise the pension 10fund to engage in an investment transaction when the fiduciary 11(i) has any direct interest in the income, gains, or profits of 12the investment adviser through which the investment 13transaction is made or (ii) has a business relationship with 14that investment adviser that would result in a pecuniary 15benefit to the fiduciary as a result of the investment 16transaction.17    Violation of this subsection (d) is a Class 4 felony. 18    (e) A board member, employee, or consultant with respect 19to a retirement system, pension fund, or investment board 20subject to this Code, except those whose investments are 21restricted by Section 1-113.2, shall not knowingly cause or 22advise the retirement system, pension fund, or investment 23board to engage in an investment transaction with an 24investment adviser when the board member, employee, 25consultant, or their spouse (i) has any direct interest in the 26income, gains, or profits of the investment adviser through   SB0673- 4 -LRB104 06980 RPS 17017 b1which the investment transaction is made or (ii) has a 2relationship with that investment adviser that would result in 3a pecuniary benefit to the board member, employee, or 4consultant or spouse of such board member, employee, or 5consultant as a result of the investment transaction. For 6purposes of this subsection (e), a consultant includes an 7employee or agent of a consulting firm who has greater than 87.5% ownership of the consulting firm.9    Violation of this subsection (e) is a Class 4 felony.10(Source: P.A. 95-950, eff. 8-29-08; 96-6, eff. 4-3-09.)